test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AD_STEM_1.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AD_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AD_STEM_1

     sçalad+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sçalad
     sçalad+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad
     sçalad+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçaladáa
     sçalad+V+INDIRECT+PAST: sçaladáan
     sçalad+V+RELATIVE: sçalads
     sçalad+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçaladáas
     sçalad+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçaladáa.ang
     sçalad+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçaladäsáa
     sçalad+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçaladäs
     sçalad+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçaladäsáang
     sçalad+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçaladäsga
     sçalad+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçaladäsáas
     sçalad+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçaladäsáa.ang
     sçalad+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçalad'úuj
     sçalad+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'úujang
     sçalad+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçaladäsáa'uujang
     sçalad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçalad'us
     sçalad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçalad'ujáa
     sçalad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áujaangaa
     sçalad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçaladäsáa'us
     sçalad+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçaladäsáa'ahlans
     sçalad+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçaladäséehl
     sçalad+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sçalad'úu
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçalad'wáa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'wáa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'wáang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sçalad'wägán
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçalad'áawaa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sçalad'áawaan
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sçalad'wáas
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçalad'áawaas
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'wáa.ang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'áawaa.ang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'wägíinii
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'wägáangaa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'wägáangaan
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçalad'wáaäsaa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçalad'wáaäs
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçalad'wáaäsaang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçalad'wáaäsga
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçalad'wáaäsaas
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'wáaäsaa.ang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasa'áa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasa'áang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasaasdláa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasaasdláang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçalad'wáa'uuj
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'wáa'uujang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçalad'wáaäsaa'uujang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçalad'wáa'us
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçalad'wáa'ujaa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'wáa'uujaangaa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçalad'wáaäsaa'us
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçalad'wáa'ahlanggang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sçalad'wáa'ahlanggan
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçalad'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçalad'wáa'ahlans
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçalad'áawaa'ahlang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçalad'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçalad'áawaa'ahlanggang
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sçalad'wáa'ahl
     sçalad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçalad'wáaäseehl
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sçalad'áng
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçalad'ángga
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'ánggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: sçalad'ánggan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçalad'áangaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: sçalad'áangaan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: sçalad'áns
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçalad'áangaas
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'angáng
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'áangaa.ang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçalad'ánggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'ánggiinii
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'ánggaangaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'ánggaangaan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçalad'ángäsaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçalad'ángäs
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçalad'ángäsaang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçalad'ángäsga
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçalad'ángäsaas
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'ángäsaa.ang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'uuj
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'uujang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçalad'ángäsaa'uujang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'us
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçalad'áng'ujaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áng'uujaangaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçalad'ángäsaa'us
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçalad'áang'ahlanggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: sçalad'áang'ahlanggan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áang'ahlanggiinii
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçalad'ángäsaa'ahlans
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçalad'áang'ahlans
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçalad'áangaa'ahlang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçalad'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçalad'áangaa'ahlanggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: sçalad'áang'ahl
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçalad'ángäseehl
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sçalad'áng'uu
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'waa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'waa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'waang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sçalad'áng'wägan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçalad'áng'aawaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sçalad'áng'aawaan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sçalad'áng'waas
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçalad'áng'aawaas
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'áng'waa.ang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'áng'aawaa.ang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áng'wägiinii
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áng'wägaangaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áng'wägaangaan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçalad'áng'waaäsaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçalad'áng'waaäs
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçalad'áng'waaäsaang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçalad'áng'waaäsga
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçalad'áng'waaäsaas
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçalad'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasaa'áng
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçalad'wáa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'waa'uuj
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'waa'uujang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçalad'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'waa'us
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçalad'áng'waa'ujaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçalad'áng'waaäsaa'us
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sçalad'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçalad'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçalad'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçalad'áng'waa'ahlans
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçalad'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçalad'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçalad'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sçalad'áng'waa'ahl
     sçalad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçalad'áng'waaäseehl
